Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-908 Distribution; right or
title of distributee. Proof that a distributee has received an instrument
or deed of distribution of assets in kind, or payment in distribution, from a
personal representative, is conclusive evidence that the distributee has
succeeded to the interest of the estate in the distributed assets, as against
all persons interested in the estate, except that the personal representative
may recover the assets or their value if the distribution was improper. [L
1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next